Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Chapter 16. Water Column Leases for Aquaculture Purposes

§§ 28.2-1600 through 28.2-1623.

Not in effect.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 892, which enacted this chapter, in cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not take effect unless state funding is included for this specific purpose in the general appropriation act for the period July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2006.” No appropriation was made. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the sections have not been given effect.